Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1812
Inquest; warrant of arrest; effect.

The warrant of a coroner in the above-stated cases shall be of equal authority with that of the county court; and when the person charged is brought before the court, the person charged shall be dealt with as a person held under a complaint in the usual form.

Laws 1879, § 107, p. 383;

R.S.1913, § 5674;

C.S.1922, § 5004;

C.S.1929, § 26-1513;

R.S.1943, § 23-1812;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 116;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 76.